Washington statutes.
RCW 3.58.010

Salaries of full time district court judges.

The annual salary of each full time district court judge shall be established by the Washington citizen's commission on salaries for elected officials. A member of the legislature whose term of office is partly coextensive with or extends beyond the present term of office of any of the officials whose salary is increased by virtue of the provisions of RCW 43.03.010, 2.04.092, 2.06.062, 2.08.092, and 3.58.010 shall be eligible to be appointed or elected to any of the offices the salary of which is increased hereby but he or she shall not be entitled to receive such increased salary until after the expiration of his or her present term of office and his or her subsequent election or reelection to the office to which he or she was appointed or elected respectively during his or her term of office as legislator.

[ 2011 c 336 s 74; 1986 c 155 s 7; 1985 c 7 s 1; 1983 c 186 s 2; 1980 c 162 s 8; 1979 ex.s. c 255 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 318 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 263 s 5; 1975 c 33 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 149 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 282, approved November 6, 1973); 1972 ex.s. c 100 s 4; 1969 c 52 s 1; 1965 c 147 s 1; 1961 c 299 s 100.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Effective dates, savings—Severability—1980 c 162: See notes following RCW 3.02.010.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 255: See note following RCW 43.03.010.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 318: See note following RCW 43.03.010.

Severability—Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 263: See notes following RCW 43.03.010.

Severability—1975 c 33: See note following RCW 35.21.780.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 149 (Initiative Measure No. 282): See note following RCW 43.03.010.

District court judges' salaries: State Constitution Art. 28 s 1.

District courts, judges pro tempore, salaries: RCW 3.34.130.

Municipal courts, cities over 400,000, judges' salaries: RCW 35.20.160.

Superior courts, judges' salaries: RCW 2.08.092.

Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials: RCW 43.03.305.